District of Columbia statutes.
38-2973.03

Repealed

Annual adoption of Capital Improvement Plan and Budget.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 203, 53 DCR 2843
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1010(g), 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4072, 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4012 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4072 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4072 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).